Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 74.04.770 and 2021 c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall establish consolidated standards of need each fiscal year which may vary by geographical areas, program, and family size, for temporary assistance for needy families, refugee assistance, ((supplemental security income,)) and benefits under RCW 74.62.030.(2)(a) Standards of need for temporary assistance for needy families, refugee assistance, and benefits under RCW 74.62.030 shall be based on studies of actual living costs and generally recognized inflation indices and shall include reasonable allowances for basic household needs including shelter, fuel, food, transportation, clothing, household maintenance and operations, personal maintenance, necessary incidentals, cell phone and internet, and out-of-pocket costs for child care and health care.(b) By July 1, 2022, to ensure the standards of need reflect the current goods and services households need, the department must use an existing, broadly used national standard that meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection as the base for annual updating in subsection (1) of this section.(c) The standard of need may take into account the economies of joint living arrangements, but unless explicitly required by federal statute, there shall not be proration of any portion of assistance grants unless the amount of the grant standard is equal to the standard of need.(3) The department is authorized to establish rateable reductions and grant maximums consistent with federal law.(((3)))(4) Payment level will be equal to need or a lesser amount if rateable reductions or grant maximums are imposed))levels for temporary assistance for needy families, refugee cash assistance, and benefits under RCW 74.62.030 will be no less than 16 percent of need or the previous year's payment level, whichever is greater. However, payment levels may not increase by more than three percent in any single state fiscal year based on this subsection. In no case shall a recipient of supplemental security income receive a state supplement less than the minimum required by federal law.--- END ---